Tennessee, session 114, HB0266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (42).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-250(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee bureau of investigation, created by § 38-6-101;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0266
000347
- 1 -